Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.505.110

Budget—Including receivables collectible in future years—Limitations.

When a school district board is unable to prepare a budget or budget extension pursuant to RCW 28A.505.170 or 28A.505.180 in which the estimated revenues for the budgeted fiscal year plus the estimated fund balance at the beginning of the budgeted fiscal year less the ending reserved fund balance for the budgeted fiscal year do not at least equal the estimated expenditures for the budgeted fiscal year, the school district board may deliver a petition in writing, at least twenty days before the budget or budget extension is scheduled for adoption, to the superintendent of public instruction requesting permission to include receivables collectible in future years, in order to balance the budget. If such permission is granted, it shall be in writing, and it shall contain conditions, binding on the district, designed to improve the district's financial condition. Any budget or appropriation adopted by the board of directors without written permission from the superintendent of public instruction that contains estimated expenditures in excess of the total of estimated revenue for the budgeted fiscal year plus estimated fund balance at the beginning of the budgeted fiscal year less ending reserve fund balance for the budgeted fiscal year shall be null and void and shall not be considered an appropriation.

[ 1990 c 33 s 421; 1983 c 59 s 8; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 11. Formerly RCW 28A.65.450.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective date—Severability—1983 c 59: See notes following RCW 28A.505.010.

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118: See note following RCW 28A.505.010.